Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Forest Fire Prevention

149.360.
Public policy declared.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky declares as a public policy of the Commonwealth the prevention and control of forest fires on or threatening the forest land within the Commonwealth in order to preserve forest and other natural resources, enhance the growth and maintenance of forests, conserve forest cover on watersheds, protect recreational, wildlife and other values, promote stability of forest-using industries, and prevent loss of life and damage to property from wildfires and other conflagrations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 1.

149.365.
Definitions for KRS 149.360 to 149.430 and 149.991.

As used in KRS 149.360 to 149.430 and 149.991, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Secretary” means the secretary for energy and environment.

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, municipality, state and federal government, or other public body or other legal entity, or any officer, employee or agent of any of the foregoing.

“Timberland” means any land which has enough timber or woody brush, standing or down, to constitute a fire menace to itself or adjoining lands, but does not include lands under cultivation or entirely in grass, nor land that is an isolated fire risk unless a fire on it would imperil the lands of an adjoining landowner.

“Flammable material” shall include but is not limited to refuse, debris, waste forest material, brush, stumps, logs, rubbish, fallen timber, grass, stubble, leaves, slash, and grain.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 159, effective July 15, 2010.

149.370.
Acts creating fire hazards in forests prohibited.

No person shall:

Within or adjacent to timberland, dispose of a lighted match, cigarette, cigar, ashes, or other flaming or glowing substance, or any other substance or thing in such condition that it is likely to ignite a forest, brush, grass, or woods fire, or throw or drop any of the aforesaid objects or substances from a moving vehicle or drop or leave any of the aforesaid objects or substances within the limits of the right-of-way of any road or highway in such timberland. The driver of a moving vehicle shall be deemed prima facie liable where it cannot be determined which of the occupants of the moving vehicle threw or dropped any of the aforesaid objects or substances.

Smoke in timberland during an emergency period of fire danger as proclaimed in KRS 149.405.

Within or adjacent to timberland, set a backfire or cause a backfire to be set, except under the direct supervision of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, or unless it can be established that the setting of such backfire is necessary for the purpose of saving life or valuable property.

Without authority, destroy, deface, or remove any notice, sign, or poster of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, posted for the better protection of wood lots, forests, or wild lands from fire or trespass.

Use or operate within or adjacent to timberland a welding torch, tarpot, or other device which may cause a fire, without clearing flammable material surrounding the operation or without taking such other reasonable precautions necessary to ensure against the starting and spreading of fire.

Discharge or cause to be discharged a gun firing incendiary or tracer bullets or tracer charge or combustible gun wadding onto or across any timberland.

Have in his possession on timberland any incendiary or tracer bullet or tracer charge, except in the course of transporting the same in conformity with law.

In or adjacent to timberland, set fire or direct another to set fire to any flammable material for debris removal, cooking, heating, or to provide light without first obtaining permission from the landowner and taking necessary precautions to prevent the fire from spreading to adjacent lands. All burning materials shall be attended until extinguished.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 3; 1966, ch. 23, § 43; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1998, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 160, effective July 15, 2010.

149.375.
Setting fire on own land regulated.

It shall be unlawful, within or adjacent to timberland, for any person to set fire to, or to procure another to set fire to, any flammable material upon land owned or leased by him unless he previously shall have taken all reasonable care and precaution, by carefully clearing around the flammable material as necessary to prevent the escape or spread of fire to lands other than those owned or leased by him. It shall also be unlawful for any employee of any such owner or lessee of land to set fire to any flammable material, upon such land unless he shall have taken similar precautions to prevent the spread of such fire to any other land. All fires shall be attended until extinguished.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 4; 1966, ch. 23, § 44; 1982, ch. 142, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 169, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

149.380.
Setting fire on land owned by another, prohibited.

No person shall:

Willfully, maliciously, or wantonly set on fire or cause or procure to be set on fire any timberland, or flammable material on such land, which land is not owned, leased or controlled by him.

Willfully, maliciously, or wantonly allow a fire to escape from his land and burn the land or property of another.

Willfully, maliciously, or wantonly set, throw or place any device, instrument or paraphernalia in or adjacent to any timberland with intent to set fire to such land, or which in the natural course of events would result in fire being set to such timberland.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 5; 1966, ch. 23, § 45.

149.385.
Wood, saw or processing mills and railroads, regulation.

Any person operating or responsible for the operation of a sawmill, stavemill, heading mill, or other woodworking mill, or any manufacturing or processing establishment not entirely enclosed with fireproof or fire resistant walls or other fireproof or fire resistant shielding, shall if such mill or establishment is in or adjacent to timberland, maintain a cleared area of at least one hundred fifty feet (150’) in all directions from any fires maintained in or about or in connection with the operation of such mill or establishment, and for a distance of one hundred feet (100’) in all directions from any sawdust pile, slab pile, or any other flammable material accumulated from the operation of such mill or establishment.

Each railroad company shall place in, on or around the top of the chimney of each of its locomotives a screen, fender, damper or other appliance that will prevent as far as possible sparks of fire escaping from the chimney within or adjacent to timberland.

Each railroad company within or adjacent to timberland shall keep its right-of-way clear and free from weeds, high grass and decayed timber that is likely to take and communicate fire from passing trains to abutting or adjacent property.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 6; 1966, ch. 23, § 46.

149.390.
Fires to capture or destroy game prohibited.

No person shall willfully or knowingly set fire to any timberland not his own, or hollow trees or stumps of flammable material on timberland not his own to capture or destroy wild birds or quadrupeds or to destroy feeding or breeding grounds thereon.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 7; 1966, ch. 23, § 47.

149.395.
Operation of waste management facilities or open dumps regulated.

Any municipality, public institution or agency, or any persons maintaining or operating a waste management facility or open dump as defined in KRS 224.1-010 in any location where fire may spread to timberland shall provide such devices and conditions therefor as will reasonably promote the safe operation thereof and guard against the escape of fire therefrom. The cabinet shall have power to make rules and regulations for the implementation of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

149.400.
Fire hazard seasons — Fires prohibited — Exceptions.

The periods commencing on February 15 and ending on April 30 and commencing on October 1 and ending on December 15 of each year are hereby declared to be and established as the fire hazard seasons. During the fire hazard seasons, even though the precautions required by KRS 149.375 shall have been taken, it shall be unlawful for any person to set fire to, or to procure another to set fire to, any flammable material capable of spreading fire, located in or within one hundred fifty feet (150’) of any woodland or brushland, except between the hours of 6:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m., prevailing local time, or when the ground is covered with snow.

This section shall not apply to fires which may be set for the purpose of burning plant beds.

This section shall not apply to fires which may be set by competent and qualified employees of railroad, utility, or pipeline companies in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of railroads, pipelines, powerlines, or other projects in the public interest on rights-of-way used for such railroads, pipelines, powerlines, or other projects, and such fires shall be attended at all times and be extinguished before the employees of such railroad, utility, or pipeline companies leave the vicinity of the fire.

This section shall not apply to fires set by trained and qualified employees of a state government agency on land owned by the state or leased or managed by the state under a written agreement with the landowner and set for the specific purpose of wildlife or plant habitat improvement, ecological site restoration, site preparation for natural or artificial regeneration or fuel reduction. Nongovernmental organizations and other governmental agencies may apply to the Division of Forestry for written approval to set fires under this subsection. Fires set under this subsection shall be in accordance with KRS 149.375. Persons who set such fires shall give written notification of the burn to the local Division of Forestry district office at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance and obtain the approval of the district office.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 9; 1966, ch. 23, § 48; 1982, ch. 142, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 169, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 47, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

149.401.
City or county ordinance banning open burning during fire hazard periods.

Without limiting the general authority granted to a county by KRS 67.083 and the general authority granted to a city by KRS 82.082, a city or county may enact an ordinance banning all open burning during periods of extraordinary forest fire hazard or fire occurrence. Such ordinance may authorize the implementation of such a ban by executive order of the chief executive officer upon notice by the Division of Forestry that a period of extraordinary forest fire hazard or fire occurrence exists.

Any ordinance promulgated by a city or county pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may establish penalties for violation of the ordinance not to exceed the penalties set forth in KRS 149.990(2).

Any ordinance promulgated by a city or county pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be enforced by the promulgating body, or by the cabinet, and referred to the appropriate county or Commonwealth attorney for prosecution.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 17, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

149.405.
Entry in forest lands during drought — Emergency proclamation — Notice.

It shall be unlawful, when the forest lands, brush lands and fields in this state or any part thereof have become so dry or parched as to create an extraordinary fire hazard endangering lives and property, for any person, except the owner, tenant or owner’s authorized agent, persons regularly engaged in cutting, processing, or moving forest products, persons engaged in constructing, maintaining, and operating utility or pipeline rights-of-way, or persons on official duty, to enter or travel in any state, county, municipal or private forest lands, brush lands, fields or idle or abandoned lands in the area so affected except on public highways or well defined private roads.

When such an emergency is found to exist by the secretary for energy and environment, the Governor may proclaim such a condition to exist in the Commonwealth or any described part thereof. The provisions of subsection (1) shall be effective only during the time such proclamation is in force and only in the area where such emergency is declared to exist.

The Secretary of State shall cause notice of such proclamation or any amendments or rescission thereof to be published in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the area affected.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 161, effective July 15, 2010.

149.410.
Commonwealth’s attorney to prosecute abatement proceedings.

The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney shall initiate and prosecute appropriate abatement proceedings by injunction or otherwise, for the prevention or correction of any condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of KRS 149.360 to 149.430. The institution or pendency of a proceeding pursuant to this section shall not bar the imposition of any penalties or the securing of any other relief provided by KRS 149.360 to 149.430, 149.991, 277.990, 512.020 to 512.040, or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 11; 1980, ch. 188, § 113, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 365, § 18, effective July 15, 1988.

149.415.
Energy and Environment Cabinet to administer law — Investigations.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall administer KRS 149.360 to 149.430 and shall have power to issue, amend and revise such rules and regulations as may be authorized hereby or as may reasonably be necessary to implement the same. The cabinet is authorized to make, conduct or participate in any investigations and surveys designed to establish the cause of and responsibility for a particular forest fire or forest fire conditions generally and to cooperate with any and all law enforcement officers of or in this state in the apprehension and prosecution of persons violating this law. Nothing contained in KRS 149.360 to 149.430 shall be construed to limit or otherwise impair the jurisdiction or powers of any other department, agency or officer of or in this state to investigate, apprehend, prosecute or punish violations of law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 12; 2010, ch. 24, § 162, effective July 15, 2010.

149.420.
State inspection of premises.

In connection with the administration of KRS 149.360 to 149.430 and any rule or regulation pursuant hereto, any duly authorized officer, employee or agent of the cabinet and any law enforcement officer or fire protection officer having jurisdiction to enforce any provisions of KRS 149.360 to 149.430 shall have power to enter upon or into any premises at any time in order to inspect the same and to ascertain the degree of compliance with KRS 149.360 to 149.430, and with such rule or regulation promulgated hereunder.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3).

149.425.
Warning signs on highway.

The state Department of Highways is authorized to purchase and erect warning signs along the roads and highways of this state advising the public of the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS 149.370 and the penalty for violation thereof.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1).

149.430.
Liability of violator for state and private damages — Disposition of damages.

If any forest fire shall originate as a result of the violation by any person of any provision of KRS 149.360 to 149.430, such person shall be, in addition to the penalty prescribed under KRS 149.991, liable to the state and to each county for the full amount of all expenses incurred by the state and county respectively in suppressing each fire, such amounts to be recoverable by action brought by the secretary for energy and environment in the name of the Commonwealth on behalf of the Commonwealth and by the county attorney on behalf of the county.

In addition to any penalty pursuant to KRS 149.991, any person violating any of the provisions of KRS 149.360 to 149.430 shall be answerable in damages to any persons suffering such damage for the cost incurred in the suppression of any fire resulting from such violation and for damage to property resulting from such fires.

Damages assessed under this section shall be ordered to be paid directly to the Energy and Environment Cabinet or to any other injured person or organization specified by written order of the court. The court shall not direct that the damages be paid through the circuit clerk.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 17; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 2002, ch. 183, § 12, effective August 1, 2002; 2010, ch. 24, § 163, effective July 15, 2010.